Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.030

Auxiliary water systems for protection from fire.

Any city or town shall have power to provide for the protection of such city or town, or any part thereof, from fire, and to establish, construct and maintain an auxiliary water system, or systems, or extensions thereof, or additions thereto, and the structures and works necessary therefor or forming a part thereof, including the acquisition or damaging of lands, rights-of-way, rights, property, water rights, and the necessary sources of supply of water for such purposes, within or without the corporate limits of such city or town, and to manage, regulate and control the same.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.030. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 5; RRS s 9356.]